District of Columbia statutes.
31-3303.02

Availability of health benefit plans to small employers.

In order to ensure the broadest availability of health benefit plans to small employers, the Commissioner shall set market conduct and other requirements for health insurers, agents, and third-party administrators, including requirements relating to the following:

(1)

Registration with the Commissioner by each group health insurer offering group health insurance coverage of its intention to offer health insurance coverage in the small group market under this subchapter;

(2)

Publication by the Commissioner of a list of all health insurers who offer coverage in the small group market, including a potential requirement applicable to agents, third-party administrators, and health insurers that no health benefit plan may be sold to a small employer by a health insurer not identified as a health insurer in the small group market;

(3)

The availability of a broadly publicized telephone number for the Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking for access by small employers to information concerning this subchapter; and

(4)

Methods concerning periodic demonstration by health insurers offering group health insurance coverage that they are marketing and issuing health benefit plans to small employers.

Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-209, § 302, 45 DCR 8433
June 11, 2004, D.C. Law 15-166, § 4(s)(2), 51 DCR 2817
1981 Ed., § 35-1032.
D.C. Law 15-166, in par. (3), substituted “Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking” for “Department of Insurance and Securities Regulation”.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-3301.01.
See notes to § 31-3301.01.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4(s)(2) of Consolidation of Financial Services Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-381, February 27, 2004, 51 DCR 2653).